Washington, session 2025-2026, HB1414.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 1. The legislature finds that the state, in partnership with employers and the public school system, has developed and invested in career and technical education programs for high school students. These programs have been developed and expanded with the intent of providing 16 and 17 year old students with hands-on work experience, coupled with education and training to work in various industries throughout our state. Many of these programs are designed to allow students to begin working in the field during or upon completion of the program; however, some state agencies have enacted rules that place age restrictions on when a student can start a program, test for a license or certification, or work in a profession for which they have been issued a certification or license. These restrictions are not required by federal law, are inconsistent with many other state laws, and are barriers to 16 and 17 year old students being able to begin coursework, or work in a profession following completion of required education, training, or certification or licensure.Therefore, the legislature intends to direct the office of the superintendent of public instruction to, through an expanded statewide career and technical education task force, to review existing laws, rules, and state agencies' policies, and develop recommendations for changes to such laws, rules, and policies to improve access to career opportunities for 16 and 17 year old students who are participating in or who have completed preparatory secondary career and technical education programs.Sec. 2. 2024 c 234 s 3 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:(1) The statewide career and technical education task force is established in the office of the superintendent of public instruction. The members of the task force are as follows:(a) The superintendent of public instruction or the superintendent's designee;(b) Two representatives from a statewide organization representing career and technical education, at least one of whom must be a career and technical education core plus classroom instructor;(c) A representative of career and technical education core plus aerospace and advanced manufacturing selected by an organization representing aerospace or advanced industrial manufacturers;(d) A representative of career and technical education core plus construction selected by an organization representing general contractors;(e) A representative of career and technical education core plus maritime selected by an organization representing maritime interests;(f) A representative of school district career and technical education directors;(g) A representative of worksite learning coordinators;(h) A representative from the state board for community and technical colleges selected by the state board for community and technical colleges;(((g)))(i) A representative from a skill center as selected by the Washington state skill center association;(((h)))(j) A representative from the allied health industry; ((and(i)))(k) A representative from the workforce training and education coordinating board selected by the workforce training and education coordinating board;(l) A representative from the department of labor and industries;(m) A representative from an association that provides support and leadership to educators in career and technical education programs;(n) A representative from career connect Washington and the career connected learning cross-agency work group established under RCW 28C.30.030;(o) At least one representative of businesses and employer associations and organizations interested in removing barriers to youth employment;(p) At least one representative of labor organizations in relevant trades interested in removing barriers to youth employment; and(q) At least one representative of other interested entities, groups, and interests identified by the office of the superintendent of public instruction.(2) The superintendent of public instruction or the superintendent's designee shall chair the task force, and staff support for the task force must be provided by the office of the superintendent of public instruction. Meetings of the task force must be held remotely by teleconference or videoconference.(3) The task force shall develop recommendations for:(a) Expanding and strengthening the accessibility, stability, and uniformity of secondary work-integrated learning opportunities, including career and technical education, career connected learning, regional apprenticeship programs, career and technical education core plus programs, work-based learning, internships and externships, and other types of work-integrated learning. Recommendations required by this subsection (3)(a) should address governance, operations, and codification, and must be in the form of draft legislation. The legislature does not intend for recommendations required by this subsection (3)(a) to modify the operation of career and technical education core plus programs established prior to January 1, 2024;(b) The successful administration and operation of career and technical education core plus programs through appropriate collaboration with industry sector leadership from program areas to inform the administration and continual improvement of the programs, review data outcomes, recommend program improvements, ensure that the programs reflect applicable industry competencies, and identify appropriate program credentials; and(c) A career and technical education core plus model framework that can be used to guide the expansion, establishment, and operation of career and technical education core plus programs. In making recommendations in accordance with this subsection (3)(c), the task force must consider, at a minimum, the following:(i) Curricula and instructional hours that lead or articulate to industry-recognized nondegree credentials;(ii) Curricula provided without cost to educators;(iii) Academic course equivalencies;(iv) Courses and course sequencing;(v) The development, maintenance, and expansion of industry, labor, and community partnerships;(vi) Program credentials;(vii) Training and professional development for educators and counselors;(viii) Alignment with postsecondary education and training programs;(ix) The promotion of student, family, and community awareness of career and technical education core plus programs, including instructional offerings and potential work placement opportunities; and(x) The development and expansion of a cohort of employers willing to hire and place students that have successfully completed career and technical education core plus programs; and(d) Changes to relevant laws, rules, and policies necessary to improve students' access to sustained interactions with industry and community professionals and provide firsthand engagement with the tasks required for the various career fields, while also maintaining appropriate protections for the safety and welfare of minors. In developing recommendations for this subsection (3)(d), the task force shall:(i) Identify barriers preventing the training, certification, or employment of minors who are participating in or who have completed a preparatory secondary career and technical education program;(ii) Assess categories of work from which the department of labor and industries has prohibited minors from engaging, but where minors are receiving or have received training through preparatory secondary career and technical education programs;(iii) Assess categories of work from which the department of labor and industries has prohibited minors from engaging, but where minors have received professional licenses or certifications from a state agency or other regulatory authority;(iv) Examine agency rules imposing age restrictions on when a minor can start training, test for or receive a license or certification, or work in a profession for which the minor is participating in or has completed a preparatory secondary career and technical education program;(v) Assess other agency restrictions on the working hours and schedules of minors who are participating in or who have completed a preparatory secondary career and technical education program; and(vi) Assess the requirements and procedures for school districts to receive approval to deliver career and technical education under RCW 28A.700.010, including whether said requirements or procedures account for relevant age restrictions imposed by agencies or regulatory entities for training, certification, and employment.(4) The office of the superintendent of public instruction, the department of labor and industries, and other affected agencies may initiate changes to agency rules and practices based on recommendations of the task force prior to the issuance of the required report and any legislative action, provided that any such changes comply with federal and state law.(((4)))(5) The task force, in accordance with RCW 43.01.036, shall report its findings and recommendations to the governor, the appropriate fiscal and policy committees of the legislature, and the state board of education by November 15, ((2025))2026.(((5)))(6) This section expires June 30, ((2026))2027.--- END ---